Utah statutes.
48-1d-1204.   Amendment of foreign registration statement.

A registered foreign limited liability partnership shall deliver to the division for filing an amendment to its foreign registration statement if there is a change in:

(1)  the name of the foreign limited liability partnership;

(2)  the jurisdiction in which the foreign limited liability partnership's statement of qualification or equivalent filing is filed;

(3)  an address required by Subsection 48-1d-1203(4); or

(4)  the information required by Subsection 48-1d-1203(5).



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

